Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1057.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 405.6. Healthier Choices in SNAP Waiver.--(a) Within 30 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall submit a request to the Food and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of Agriculture for a SNAP food restriction waiver permitting the Commonwealth to exclude the following products from eligibility under SNAP:(1) Sugar-sweetened beverages, including, but not limited to, sodas and other beverages with added sugars and minimal nutritional value.(2) Candy.12345678910111213141516171819 (3) Prepared desserts.(b) Within 60 days of approval of the waiver under subsection (a), the department shall promulgate regulations and implement necessary changes to exclude the products identified in subsection (a) from purchase under SNAP.(c) The department shall notify the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives both when the department submits the waiver under subsection (a) and upon receiving notice of the waiver's approval or denial.(d) Not later than two years after the implementation of a waiver under subsection (a), the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee shall prepare and submit a report to the General Assembly evaluating:(1) The potential and actual cost savings to Medicaid and other publicly funded health programs from reduced consumption of non-nutritive foods.(2) The public health impacts associated with restricting the items under subsection (a) from SNAP eligibility, including effects on rates of obesity, diabetes and other diet-related chronic conditions.(3) Any administrative or implementation challenges arising from the waiver, including impacts on SNAP vendors and program recipients.(e) The restrictions of the waiver under subsection (a) shall not apply to: (1) One hundred percent fruit or vegetable juice with no added sugars.(2) Milk or milk substitutes when milk or the milk 20250SB1057PN1240 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 substitute is the primary ingredient.(3) Infant formula. (4) Beverages for medical use. (5) Medical foods, as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 360ee(b)(3) (relating to grants and contracts for development of drugs for rare diseases and conditions).(6) Liquids sold for use as a meal replacement for weight reduction or other related purposes.(7) Unflavored water. (8) Beverages sweetened only with non-nutritive sweeteners. (f) Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Beverage for medical use." A beverage suitable for human consumption and manufactured for uses as:(1) an o ral or enteral nutritional therapy for individuals who cannot absorb or metabolize caloric or dietary nutrients from usual food or beverages;(2) an oral or enteral rehydration electrolyte solution formulated to prevent or treat dehydration due to illness; or(3) a beverage that meets the definition of "medical food" under 21 U.S.C. 360ee(b)(3)."Candy." Chewing gum, mints and preparations of fruits, nuts, popcorn or similar products when coated with chocolate, caramel, toffee or other confectionery coatings. The term does not include:(1) protein, nutrition/meal-replacement, granola or cereal bars that bear a nutrition facts panel and are labeled and marketed as such bars;(2) baking or cooking ingredients, including candied fruit 20250SB1057PN1240 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for baking, chocolate chips or baking chocolate bars, cocoa powder and marshmallows of any size; or(3) dried fruit, nuts, popcorn or trail mix consisting primarily of nuts, seeds and dried fruit, unless coated or covered in a confectionery coating."Prepared dessert." A processed, shelf-stable, ready-to-eat, prepackaged sweet food intended for immediate consumption without any further preparation. The term includes sweet baked goods and confections intended to be eaten as desserts. The term does not include:(1) protein, nutrition/meal-replacement, granola or cereal bars that bear a nutrition facts panel and are labeled and marketed as such bars; or(2) bars primarily composed of nuts, seeds and dried fruit that are not coated in a confectionery coating."SNAP." The Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program."Sugar-sweetened beverage." Any nonalcoholic beverage, whether sold ready to drink or prepared from a syrup, powder or concentrate, that contains added sugar, as defined in 21 CFR 101.9(c)(6)(iii) (relating to nutrition labeling of food), or sugars from fruit or vegetable juice concentrates used as sweeteners, including, but not limited to, soda or soft drinks, flavored waters, energy drinks, pre-sweetened coffee or tea beverages and nonalcoholic mixers. The term does not include one hundred percent fruit or vegetable juice with no added sugars, milk or milk substitutes when milk or the substitute is the primary ingredient, infant formula, medical foods, as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 360ee(b)(3), liquids sold for use as a meal replacement for weight reduction or other purposes, unflavored water or beverages sweetened only with non-nutritive sweeteners.20250SB1057PN1240 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB1057PN1240 - 5 - 1